Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.2211

Washington professional educator standards board—Revision of assessments to meet revised STEM-related standards.

(1) The professional educator standards board shall revise assessments for prospective teachers and teachers adding subject area endorsements required for teacher certification under RCW 28A.410.220 to measure the revised standards in RCW 28A.410.221.

(2) The professional educator standards board shall require that successful candidates for the residency certificate demonstrate effective subject specific instructional methods that address the revised standards.

[ 2021 c 198 s 5; 2011 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2021 c 198: See notes following RCW 28A.410.283.